Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 25 Narragansett Bay Commission

46-25-1.
Short title.

This chapter is known as the “Narragansett Bay Commission Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 278, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 307, § 2.

46-25-2.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared that:

There exists in the Providence metropolitan area and Narragansett Bay severe water quality problems resulting from the discharge of pollutants, conventional, and unconventional, into Narragansett Bay.

It is further found and declared that Narragansett Bay may be the greatest natural resource of the state of Rhode Island, and continuing discharge of these pollutants jeopardizes the environmental integrity of the entire Narragansett Bay and creates severe and detrimental ecological and economic impact upon the people of the state of Rhode Island.

It is further found and declared that because of the scope and complexity of the work necessary to correct and minimize these pollution discharges and the scope of financing required, local municipal governments in the Providence metropolitan area have been unable alone to cope properly and immediately with the magnitude of the pollution discharges.

It is further found and declared that economy and efficiency dictate the desirability for an overall plan for dealing with pollution discharges in the Narragansett Bay and the Providence metropolitan area.

It is further found and declared that the most effective and efficient method to combat the discharge of pollutants in the Narragansett Bay is to create a Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission, to be charged with the acquisition, planning, construction, financing, extension, improvement, and operation and maintenance of publicly owned sewage treatment facilities in the Narragansett Bay water quality management district, with appropriate provision for a portion of the financing of the activities to be undertaken by the pledging of the full faith and credit of the state of Rhode Island.

Title 46, chapter 21 created the Blackstone Valley district commission and charged it with the planning, construction, operation, and maintenance of facilities to deal with the sewage and industrial wastes which originate in municipalities and industries located in the Blackstone and Moshassuck Valleys and are discharged into the waters of the state including the Seekonk and Blackstone rivers which flow into the Narragansett Bay without proper treatment.

Economy, efficiency and technological advances dictate the desirability of having one entity to formulate, coordinate, and regulate an overall plan to reduce the discharge of sewerage and industrial wastes originating from the Blackstone and Moshassuck Valleys into the waters of this state and the discharge of pollutants into Narragansett Bay from the Narragansett Bay water quality management district.

The most effective and efficient method of effectuating such an overall plan is to merge the Blackstone Valley district commission with and into the Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission.

The most effective and efficient method of effectuating an overall plan for dealing with discharges in the watershed of the Narragansett Bay is the merger, consolidation, acquisition, operation and management of other sewage treatment facilities located in the state with or by the Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission as the commission may from time to time determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 108, § 2.

46-25-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning:

“Administrative penalty” means a monetary penalty not to exceed the civil penalty specified in §

46-25-25.2

.

“Commission” means the Narragansett Bay commission. Whenever in any general or public law, reference is made to the “Narragansett Bay Water Quality Management District Commission” the reference refers to and means the Narragansett Bay Commission.

“Compliance schedule” means a schedule of remedial measures including an enforceable sequence of actions, or operations leading to compliance with an effluent limitation or any other limitation, prohibition, or standard.

“Fund” means the Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission fund to be held by the commission.

“Narragansett Bay water quality management district” means and includes:

The city of Providence and those portions of the city of Cranston and portions of the towns of Johnston, North Providence, and Lincoln formerly served by the city of Providence sewage treatment system as well as the cities of East Providence, Pawtucket, and Central Falls, the towns of Lincoln and Cumberland, and that portion of the town of Smithfield lying northeast of the Douglas Pike, also called state route No. 7;

Any other portions of those municipalities as may by resolution request to be served by the district and which are accepted by the commission as part of the district; and

Any other cities or towns or districts in Rhode Island or portions thereof as may, from time to time, join the district pursuant to agreement with the commission, providing for the acquisition of the sewage treatment facilities of such city, town, or district, or the merger and consolidation of such district into the commission, or the management and operation of the sewage treatment facilities of such city, town or district by the commission.

“Notes” as used in §§

46-25-51

—

46-25-67

mean the notes, securities, or other obligations or evidences of indebtedness issued by the commission pursuant to this chapter in anticipation of receiving user fees or state or federal funds, all of which shall be issued under the name of and known as obligations of the Narragansett Bay water quality management district.

“Person” means and includes an individual, firm, partnership, association, and private or municipal corporation and federal or state agencies.

“Pollutant” means the same as defined in §

46-12-1

.

“Pollution” means the same as defined in §

46-12-1

.

“Project” means the Narragansett Bay water quality management district project, and shall include the acquisition, ownership, design, operation, construction, repair, rehabilitation, improvement, development, sale, lease or disposition of, or the provision of financing for, any sewage treatment facility.

“Revenue bonds and notes” as used in §§

46-25-58

—

46-25-67

, mean and include the bonds, notes, securities, or other obligations or evidences of indebtedness issued by the commission pursuant to §§

46-25-58

—

46-25-67

, all of which shall be issued under the name of or known as obligations of the Narragansett Bay commission and shall be secured solely by the revenues provided therein.

“Sewage” means the same as “pollutant” as defined in §

46-12-1

.

“Sewage treatment facilities” means any sewage treatment plant, structure, combined sewer overflows, equipment, interceptors, mains, and pumping stations, or other property, real, personal, or mixed, for the treatment, storage, collection, transporting, or disposal of sewage, or any property or system to be used in whole or in part for any of the aforesaid purposes, or any other property or system incidental to, or which has to do with, or the end purpose of which is any of the foregoing; provided, however, that the term shall not include any system of lateral sewers within a municipality.

“Source” means any building, structure, facility, or installation from which there is or may be the discharge of pollutants.

“Water supplier” means any person, including a municipal water department or agency, public water system, special water district, or private water company engaged in the distribution of water for potable purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 366, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 365, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 108, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 278, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 307, § 2.

46-25-4.
Establishment of commission — Purpose.

There is hereby authorized, created, and established a public corporation of the state having a distinct legal existence from the state and not constituting a department of state government to be known as “The Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission”, with such powers as are set forth in this chapter, for the purposes of acquiring, planning, constructing, extending, improving, and operating and maintaining publicly owned sewage treatment facilities in the district.

It is the intent of the general assembly, by the passage of this chapter, to vest in the commission all powers, authority, rights, privileges, and titles which may be necessary to enable it to accomplish the purposes herein set forth, and this chapter and the powers herein granted shall be liberally construed in conformity with those purposes.

The commission and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law or until it shall cease to exist under the timetable contained in §

46-25-48

. Upon termination of the existence of the commission, all its rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the state, and, in accordance with law, the governor may permit whatever rights and properties he or she shall see fit to pass to municipalities located within the district, if the municipality or municipalities accept the rights or properties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-5.
General powers.

The commission shall have the following powers, together with all powers incidental thereto or necessary for the performance of those stated in this chapter:

To sue and be sued, complain and defend, in its corporate name.

To have a seal which may be altered at pleasure and to use the seal by causing it, or a facsimile thereof, to be impressed or affixed or in any other manner reproduced.

To purchase, take, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal in and with, real or personal property, or any interest therein, wherever situated.

To make and execute agreements of lease, construction contracts, operation contracts, and all other contracts and instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the commission granted by this chapter.

To make guarantees and incur or assume liabilities as the commission may deem appropriate.

To invest and reinvest its funds.

To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States, and any of its agencies, and of agencies of this state and its municipalities in the work of the commission.

To accept grants, donations, drafts, loans of funds, and contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise, from the United States or any of its agencies, from this state and its agencies, or from any other source, and to use or expend those moneys, services, materials, or other contributions in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

To make assessments and impose reasonable and just user charges, and to pay for such expenses as may be required by law or as may be determined by the commission to be necessary for the maintenance and operation of the project. In addition to the foregoing, the assessments and user charges imposed pursuant to this chapter by the commission shall be set at a rate sufficient to enable the commission to pay the debt service cost on not in excess of fourteen million and fifty-nine thousand dollars ($14,059,000) of general obligation bonds and on notes issued pursuant to this chapter. Any user charge, fee, or rate shall be subject to the approval of the public utilities commission.

To establish a sewage pretreatment program, and to require as a condition, to the grant or reissuance of any approval, license, or permit required under the program, that the person applying for the approval, license, or permit, pay to the commission a reasonable fee based on the cost of reviewing and acting upon the application and based on the costs of implementing the program. In addition, where violations of the provisions of §§

46-25-25

—

46-25-25.3

, or of any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant thereto have occurred, the violator shall reimburse the commission for the actual costs of implementing and enforcing the terms of the permit, rule, regulation, or order as a condition to the grant or reissuance of any approval, license, or permit.

To acquire or contract to acquire, from any person, the federal government or the state, or any agency of either the federal government or state, by grant, purchase, lease, gift, condemnation, or otherwise, or to obtain options for the acquisition of any property, real or personal, improved or unimproved, and interests in land less than the fee thereof; and to own, hold, clear, improve, develop, and rehabilitate, and to sell, assign, exchange, transfer, convey, lease, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of or encumber the property for the purposes of carrying out the provisions and intent of this chapter for such consideration as the commission shall determine.

To elect or appoint officers and agents of the commission, and to define their duties and fix their compensation, including authority to employ attorneys, accountants, architectural, and engineering consultants, and such other employees or agents as the commission shall deem necessary in its judgment.

To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with this chapter, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the commission, and the bylaws may contain provisions indemnifying any person who is or was a director or a member of the commission, in the manner and to the extent provided in §

7-1.2-814

.

To construct, acquire, repair, develop, own, operate, maintain, extend, improve, rehabilitate, renovate, equip, and furnish a project and make provision for its management.

To prepare or cause to be prepared plans, specifications, designs, and estimates of costs of construction, reconstruction, rehabilitations, improvement, alteration, or repair of a project, and to modify the same.

To issue orders of general or specific applicability to carry out the purposes of the project.

To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect its purposes.

To impose administrative penalties in accordance with the provisions of §

46-25-25.4

.

To secure certain payments on its revenue bonds and notes, in whole or in part, by insurance or by letters or lines of credit or other credit facilities.

To enter into agreements, contracts, and other arrangements with the state and any of its departments, agencies, boards or commissions relating to the execution or performance of any function or purpose of the commission, including, but not limited to, investments, employee compensation and employee benefits, and the state and its departments, agencies, boards and commissions are hereby authorized to enter into such agreements, contracts and other arrangements with the commission, and upon the request of the commission shall enter into such agreements, contracts and other arrangements with the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 366, § 4; P.L. 1987, ch. 478, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 557, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 35; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 35.

46-25-6.
Composition of commission — Appointment of members.

The commission shall consist of nineteen (19) members to be appointed in the following manner: ten (10) members shall be appointed by the governor from the public as herein provided. Two (2) members shall be appointed by the mayor of the city of Providence; one member each shall be appointed by the mayor of the town of North Providence, the mayor of the town of Johnston, mayor of the city of Pawtucket, mayor of the town of Cumberland, town administrator of the town of Lincoln, mayor of the city of Central Falls, and mayor of the city of East Providence.

The appointments to the commission shall be made as follows:

The governor shall appoint two (2) members of the commission to serve until the first day of April, 1981, two (2) members to serve until the first day of April, 1982, four (4) members to serve until the first day of April, 1983, one member to serve until the first day of April 1993, one member to serve until the first day of April 1994, and all to serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. In the month of March in each year thereafter, the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint successors to the members of the commission whose term is expiring in that year, each member so appointed to hold office for a three (3) year period commencing on the first day of April in the year of appointment and continuing until the first day of April in the third year after his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Any vacancy for a public member, which may occur in the commission, shall be filled by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The mayor of the city of Providence shall appoint one member of the commission to serve until the first day of April, 1982, and one member to serve until the first day of April, 1983, and all to serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. The mayor of the town of North Providence and the mayor of the town of Johnston each shall appoint a member to serve until the first day of April, 1981, each member so appointed shall serve until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The Mayor of the city of Pawtucket shall appoint one member of the commission to serve until the first day of April, 1993, and such member so appointed shall serve until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The town administrator of the town of Lincoln and the mayor of the city of Central Falls shall each appoint one member of the commission to serve until the first day of April, 1994, and each member so appointed shall serve until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The mayors of the town of Cumberland and the city of East Providence shall each appoint one member of the commission to serve until the first day of April, 1995, and each member so appointed shall serve until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. In the month of March in each year thereafter, the respective mayors and town administrator shall appoint a successor to the member of the commission whose term is expiring, each member so appointed to hold office for a three (3) year period, commencing on the first day of April in the year of appointment and continuing until the first day of April in the third year after his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Any vacancy which may occur in the commission shall be filled by the appointing authority who originally appointed the member, and the appointment shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Members of the commission shall be eligible for reappointment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 309, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 156; P.L. 2013, ch. 329, § 1.

46-25-7.
Officers of the commission — Quorum and vote required.

Forthwith, after May 16, 1980, and annually in the month of April thereafter, the commission shall elect one of its members as chairperson, and one of its members as vice chairperson. A simple majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. No vacancy in the membership of the commission shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all of the duties of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 309, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 329, § 1.

46-25-8.
Compensation — Personnel.

The members of the commission shall not be compensated for attendance at any board meeting, but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in carrying out their duties under this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, no officer or employee of the state shall be deemed to have forfeited or shall forfeit his or her office or employment by reason of his or her acceptance of membership on the commission or his or her service thereto.

The commissioners shall employ an executive director who shall also be the secretary and who shall administer, manage, and direct the affairs and business of the commission, subject to the policies, control, and direction of the commissioners. The commissioners may employ technical experts and other officers, agents, and attorneys and fix their qualifications, duties, and compensation. Employees of the commission shall not, by reason of their employment, be employees of the state for any purpose, any provision of the general laws to the contrary notwithstanding, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, chapters 29, 39, and 42 of title 28 and chapters 4, 8, 9, and 10 of title 36. Those employees of the commission who were employed prior to June 30, 1999, shall continue to be covered by §§

36-4-59

,

36-5-7

and

36-5-8

. The employees are not entitled to the provisions of §§

36-4-59

,

36-5-7

and

36-5-8

while employed by the commission. The employees are only entitled to the provisions of these statutes in the event that any such employee returns to employment in the classified service in a department within the executive branch. The commissioners may employ other employees, permanent and temporary. The commissioners may delegate to one or more of its agents or employees any administrative duties that they may deem proper.

The secretary shall keep a record of the proceedings of the commission and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the commission and of its minute book and seal. He or she shall have authority to cause to be made copies of all minutes and other records and documents of the commission, and to give certificates under the seal of the commission to the effect that the copies are true copies and all persons dealing with the commission may rely upon the certificates.

The department of administration may furnish the commission with suitable offices and telephone service in the state house, state office building, or some other convenient location, for the transaction of its business.

The commissioners of the commission shall, at regular intervals conduct business meetings for the purpose of carrying out its general business. The meetings shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42 entitled “open meetings”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. XXII, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 35.

46-25-9.
Appropriated moneys and advances from general fund.

The commission is authorized to accept such moneys as may be appropriated from time to time by the general assembly for the carrying out of its duties hereunder including, without limitation, the payment of the initial expenses of administration and operation; provided, however, that any such appropriation shall be considered as a loan to the commission from the general fund of the state and shall be returned thereto when the commission is self supporting or at such time as may otherwise be stipulated in the act appropriating the money.

The commission is further authorized to accept advances or loans of funds from the general fund of the state:

In anticipation of the receipt of federal funds; and

For the purpose of meeting debt service liabilities and providing for the construction, maintenance, or operation of the project during such periods of time as the fund may be insufficient for those purposes and, at the request of the commission, the director of the department of administration is authorized and empowered, with the approval of the governor, to make those advances.

Provided, however, that the advances shall be returned to the general fund at such time or times as the director shall have specified, and that the total amount of the advances outstanding and unreturned at any one time shall not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000); and, however, for the period May 1, 1989 through June 30, 1991 the advance shall not exceed three million six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($3,675,000) provided that subject to the report and order of the public utilities commission in docket No. 1968, the commission may issue revenue bonds or notes for the purpose of repaying the advances from the general fund of the state of Rhode Island provided under this chapter, in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed three million six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($3,675,000) in accordance with the provisions of §

46-25-58

except that notwithstanding subsections (c) and (d) of §

46-25-58

, such revenue bonds or notes, including all refundings and renewals thereof, shall be payable in such installments and at such times not exceeding three (3) years from the date of the original issue of such revenue bonds or notes. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the advances upon receipt by the controller of proper vouchers signed by the director of the department of administration and approved by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 127, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 29, § 1.

46-25-10.
Acquisition of facilities from municipalities.

The commission shall acquire the city of Providence Fields Point sewage treatment plant, as well as interceptors, combined sewer overflow facilities, force mains, and appurtenant facilities, and the land, property, easements, and other interests in property from municipalities within the district as may be necessary or desirable in its discretion to carry out the duties under this chapter.

The acquisition of the treatment plant, facilities, interceptors, combined sewer overflow facilities, mains, and other appurtenant facilities, and the lands, property, easements, or other interests in property shall be paid for solely by user charges and fees to be assessed by the commission in accordance with this chapter. As part of the acquisition, the commission may agree to assume payment of financial obligation debt service liabilities of the city of Providence for long term bonded debt, that is, for debt with maturity schedules of not less than twenty (20) years incurred for capital improvement of the sewage treatment facilities, as determined in the sole discretion of the commission, pursuant to findings of the auditor general, in an amount not to exceed fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000); provided, however, that the payment of the debt service liabilities shall be paid solely out of user charges and fees to be assessed by the commission in accordance with this chapter. User charges assessed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to those charges under the authority of §

46-25-5(9)

, and shall be reasonable and just and subject to the approval of the public utilities commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 62.

46-25-10.1.
Repealed.

46-25-11.
Power to acquire land.

For any purposes of this chapter, the commission may, at any time and from time to time, take by eminent domain or acquire by purchase or otherwise, such land, water rights, easements, and other property or interests in property, public and private, as it may determine necessary or desirable for the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-12.
Interests in land taken.

Any taking under this chapter may be in fee or otherwise, perpetual in duration or for a limited period of time, as the commission shall determine and set forth in the order of taking.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-13.
Eminent domain procedure.

In the exercise of its power of eminent domain under this chapter, the commission shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 6 of title 37.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-14.
Annual report.

In the month of January, the commission shall make an annual report to the governor and to the general assembly of its activities for the preceding fiscal year. Each report shall set forth a complete statement covering its operations during the year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-15.
Cooperation with federal government.

The commission shall have full and complete authority to cooperate with and assist the federal government in all matters relating to the planning, constructing, equipping, maintenance, and operation of the project in the event that the federal government should make any federal funds or federal assistance available therefor.

The commission, or any officers or executives designated by it, may act as an agent of the federal government in accordance with the requirements of any federal legislation related to that federal assistance.

The commission is hereby authorized to accept the provisions of any federal legislation related to federal assistance, and may file written evidence of each acceptance with the federal government. Each acceptance shall be duly signed by the chairperson or such other person or persons as the commission may designate.

The commission may enter into all necessary contracts and agreements with the federal or state governments, or any agency thereof, necessary or incident to the project, and all the contracts and agreements shall be signed in the name of the commission by the chairperson or some other person or persons designated by the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-16.
Application for federal and state aid.

Whenever it shall be necessary to obtain assistance from the federal or state governments in the form of loans, advances, grants, subsidies, and otherwise, directly or indirectly, for the execution of the project, the commission may make all necessary applications for those purposes. All the applications shall be made in writing in the name of the commission, and shall be duly signed by the chairperson or such other person or persons as the commission may designate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-17.
Use of federal and state funds.

The commission may, for the purpose of carrying out the project or any part thereof herein authorized, accept or use any federal or state funds or assistance, or both, provided therefor under any federal or state law. In the event that federal or state funds or assistance are made available for execution of the project, the project shall be carried out and executed in all respects subject to the provisions of the appropriate federal and state laws providing for the construction of the projects, and the rules and regulations made pursuant thereto, and to such terms, conditions, rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the federal and state law, rules, and regulations, as the commission may establish to insure the proper execution of the project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-18.
Receipt and deposit of federal funds.

All moneys paid to the commission by the federal government for the purpose of executing the project shall be received by the executive director of the commission and applied in the following order of priority:

For the payment of debt service on, or the recall, or the redemption of bonds and notes issued by the state in anticipation of the federal project payments; or

If no bonds or notes of the state issued in anticipation of federal project payments are outstanding, then the moneys shall be deposited in the fund to be used for the purposes for which the federal government granted the moneys.

To the extent permitted by federal law, any federal funds or assistance to the state of Rhode Island in any one federal fiscal year for sewer projects funded under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., as amended, for fiscal years commencing October 1, 1982, and thereafter, shall be allocated so that fifty percent (50%) of the federal funds or assistance so received shall be assigned to this project; provided, however, that more than fifty percent (50%) of the federal funds may be assigned to this project if the remaining fifty percent (50%) is not fully obligated for other projects in the state of Rhode Island outside the district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 397, § 1.

46-25-19.
Sewer connections.

The commission shall have full and complete power and authority to limit, deny, or cause appropriate direct or indirect connections to be made between any building or property located in the district generating sanitary or industrial wastewater, and any public sewer or appurtenance thereof discharging to the project. The commission shall prescribe such rules and regulations for sewer connections as in the opinion of the commission are necessary and appropriate for the maintenance and operation of the project. No person shall make any connection from any structure to any sewer or appurtenance thereto discharging to the project without first being granted a written permit from the commission, in accordance with the rules and regulations. The commission shall also have full and complete power and authority to compel any person in the district, for the purpose of sewage disposal, to establish a direct connection on his or her property, or at the boundary thereof, to any publicly owned sewer discharging to the district sewer project, and to cause the connection to be made at the expense of the person, firm, or corporation.

The term “appurtenance”, as used herein, shall be construed to include adequate pumping facilities, whenever the pumping facilities shall be necessary to deliver sewage into the project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 58.

46-25-19.1.
Recording of sewer systems.

Starting on January 1, 2012, the commission shall maintain as-built drawings and plans on any new or upgraded sewer main it owns and operates. Such as-built drawings and plans shall be the responsibility of the person that the commission has designated and shall be in a form designated by the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 92, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 103, § 4.

46-25-20.
Pipes along highway or railroad.

Whenever the commission shall lay or install any pipes or other equipment under any public highway, private way, right-of-way, or tracks, the commission shall, as far as possible, restore the public highway, private way, right-of-way, or tracks, to its former condition. Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the commission to condemn any portion of the right-of-way of any railroad, or other public service company, except for the purpose of crossing the same, either above or below grade, and of maintaining suitable and convenient supports for the crossing, in such manner as not to render unsafe, or to impair the usefulness of, the right-of-way for the railroad or the purposes of the public service company.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1.

46-25-21.
Sewer, user fees, charges, and assessments.

For the purpose of causing the project and its operation, maintenance, and improvements to be self liquidating, the commission shall assess any person having a direct or an indirect connection to the project the reasonable charges for the use, operation, maintenance, and improvements of the project. The sewer user fees, charges, and assessments shall be subject to the approval of the public utilities commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 156, § 1.

46-25-21.1.
Petition in superior court for relief from assessment.

Any person aggrieved on any ground whatsoever by any sewer use fee, charge, or assessment against him or her may within three (3) years after the first day designated for the payment of the sewer use fee, charge, or assessment, or the first installment thereof, if payable in installments, file an appeal with the Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission, and within sixty (60) days after a final decision of the commission appeal, where the person has timely appealed the assessment, file a petition in the superior court for the county in which the property lies for relief from the sewer use fee, charge, or assessment, to which petition the commission shall be made a party respondent; provided, however, that all such appeals must be made no later than six (6) months after the person assessed the fee has transferred the property to a third party.

For the purpose of this section, an “aggrieved person” shall be the person who has been assessed the sewer use fee, charge or assessment that is being contested. The right to contest an assessment shall be personal to the person assessed and shall not be assignable or transferable.

This remedy shall be exclusive. Any person alleging an illegal, erroneous, incorrect, or void fee, charge, or assessment against him or her shall be confined to the remedies stated herein. No petition shall, before judgment, stay any proceedings for collecting the sewer use fee, charge, or assessment. The Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission may promulgate regulations to effectuate this provision and to eliminate frivolous appeals. No appeal shall be heard if the appeal is based on the rates set by the public utilities commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 356, § 1.

46-25-22.
Payment of sewer user fees, charges and assessments.

The commission shall proceed under the provisions of this chapter to collect the fees, charges, and assessments from any person so assessed. Each person so assessed shall pay the fees, charges, or assessments within the time frame prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission. The commission may collect the fees, charges, and assessments in the same manner in which taxes are collected by municipalities, with no additional fees, charges, assessments, or penalties other than those provided for in chapter 9 of title 44. Provided, however, that such fees, charges and assessments against residential condominium occupants or residential condominium associations shall be set at a residential rate and not at a business, commercial, or other rate. All unpaid charges shall be a lien upon the real estate of the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 238, § 1.